Maryland, session 2026, HB0967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–109.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0967*

HOUSE BILL 967
(2) “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS” MEANS
THE INDEX PUBLISHED MONTHLY BY THE BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS OF THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX THAT IS THE U.S. CITY
AVERAGE OF ALL ITEMS IN A BASKET OF CONSUMER GOODS AND SERVICES.
(3) (I) “ENVIRONMENTAL SURCHARGE OR FEE” MEANS A CHARGE
AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED UNDER STATE LAW, REGULATION, OR COMMISSION
ORDER THAT IS COLLECTED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY FROM ITS CUSTOMERS FOR
THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF SUPPORTING ENVIRONMENTAL INITIATIVES.
(II) “ENVIRONMENTAL SURCHARGE OR FEE” INCLUDES:
1. A SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER § 7–222(D)(2) OF
THIS TITLE;
2. A SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER § 7–704.2(A)(4) OF
THIS TITLE; AND
3. THE RECOVERY OF COMPLIANCE FEES UNDER § 7–706
OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ENVIRONMENTAL SURCHARGE
OR FEE IMPOSED UNDER:
(1) § 7–203 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) § 7–1220 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(3) § 7–1226 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL CALCULATE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE PRECEDING 12 MONTHS ENDING
JUNE 30 OF THAT YEAR; AND
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE AVERAGE RESIDENTIAL
ELECTRICITY BILL FOR THE PRECEDING 12 MONTHS ENDING JUNE 30 OF THAT
YEAR.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL CALCULATE:

HOUSE BILL 967 3
(I) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS BY COMPARING THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX
FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30 TO THE AVERAGE OF THE
INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE SECOND PRECEDING JUNE 30; AND
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE AVERAGE RESIDENTIAL
ELECTRICITY BILL BY COMPARING THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE OF RESIDENTIAL
ELECTRICITY BILLS FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING JUNE 30 TO
THE WEIGHTED AVERAGE OF RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY BILLS FOR THE 12 MONTHS
ENDING ON THE SECOND PRECEDING JUNE 30.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE AVERAGE
RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY BILL EXCEEDED THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS IN A GIVEN YEAR, AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY NOT COLLECT ANY ENVIRONMENTAL SURCHARGES OR
FEES DURING THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING YEAR.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.